Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB436.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 148.021 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Parks shall exercise all administrative functions of the state relating to the operation of
state parks, shrines, monuments, and museums except those allocated to the historical society.
(2) The department may request acquisition, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 42, 45, 45A, 56, and the
provisions made in this chapter, of lands by purchase, lease, or otherwise, on which to operate state parks.
(3) The department may improve said parks by constructing and equipping improvements or facilities in said
parks.
(4) The department may operate said parks, fix fees and charges for the use of said parks and the improvements
and facilities constructed therein, and provide for the collection of said fees and charges and the proper
accounting therefor, except that:
(a) The department shall not impose boat launching fees at any boat ramp over which it has authority and
control;[ and]
(b) The department shall not allow, grant permission to, or permit any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other form of business arrangement to which the
department has granted a rental or leasehold interest or has engaged to manage or operate facilities that
include a public boat launching ramp, to charge a boat launching fee at any boat ramp; and
(c) 1. The department shall not impose on graduates of the PGA HOPE program any green fees or
associated golf rates except fees for golf cart rental.
2. To claim the fee and rate exemption provided by this paragraph, a PGA HOPE graduate shall
present his or her valid PGA HOPE graduate card at the time of purchase, and the exemption
shall extend to the PGA graduate and one (1) guest.
3. As used in this paragraph, "PGA HOPE program" means the Helping Our Patriots
Everywhere program established by the Professional Golfers' Association of America's Reach
Foundation, which introduces and teaches golf to veterans and active-duty military to enhance
their physical, mental, social, and emotional well-being.
(5) The Department of Parks is authorized to enter into any agreement with the Breaks Interstate Park
Commission for the operation of any facilities in the Breaks Interstate Park.
(6) The Department of Parks is authorized to accept, for deposit in a trust and agency fund account in accordance
with KRS 45.253, on behalf of the state any grant or contribution, federal or otherwise, to assist in meeting the
cost of carrying out the functions assigned to the Department of Parks.
(7) Notwithstanding any provision in KRS Chapter 41, 45, 45A, or 47 to the contrary, there may be established
separate cash funds and depositories at each state park from which immediate payment of refunds may be
made to a patron or guest of such state park of any unearned money advanced or paid by such guest or patron.
The department may accept from a guest or patron an amount which includes the fee for the service rendered
plus a gratuity for the waitress or other designated person and remit the gratuity directly from the depository or
cash fund to the designated recipient thereof. Such funds or depositories shall be governed by regulations
established by the Department of Parks and approved by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(8) The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with provisions of KRS Chapter
13A in order to carry out the provisions of this section.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version